Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1385.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Paragraph (2) of the definition of "public utility" in section 102 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subparagraph and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this part which are applicable to specific provisions of this part, the following words and phrases when used in this part shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Data center." A retail electric customer facility that is used primarily or exclusively for electronic information 123456789101112131415161718 services such as the management, storage, processing and dissemination of electronic data and information through the use of computer systems, servers, networking equipment and related components.* * *"Public utility."* * *(2) The term does not include:* * *(viii) A data center.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1385PN1848 - 2 - 123456789101112